Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1116.02
Information management services division; purpose.

The purpose of the information management services division is to provide centralized, coordinated, and efficient information management services to all state agencies and to prevent unnecessary duplication of information management operations and applications in state government.

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 35;

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 36.